Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-3143
Tax credit; application; deadline.

There shall be no new applications for tax credits filed under the Nebraska Shortline Rail Modernization Act after December 31, 2033. All applications and all credits pending or approved before such date shall continue in full force and effect.

Laws 2024, LB937, § 23.